Washington statutes.
RCW 15.51.020

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Brassica" means any plants in the genus Brassica.

(2) "Brassica seed crop" means any commercial production of any species, hybrid, or variety of the genus Brassica that results in pollen or seed formation. Brassica seed crop includes, but is not limited to, Brassica seeds grown for planting, and species generally known as rapeseed or canola, including Brassica napus, Brassica rapa, and Brassica juncea, grown for oil or biofuel and associated by-products. For purposes of this chapter, forage and cover crops from the genus Brassica are considered Brassica seed crops. Plants from the genus Brassica grown as vegetables for human or animal consumption such as cabbage, broccoli, rutabaga, and kohlrabi are not Brassica seed crops as long as they are not allowed to produce pollen or seed.

(3) "Department" means the state department of agriculture.

(4) "Director" means the director of the department or the director's authorized representative.

(5) "Grower" means a person who grows a Brassica seed crop within a Brassica seed production district or, for purposes of RCW 15.51.030, within a proposed Brassica seed production district.

(6) "Processor" means a person who commercially uses, sells, or processes a Brassica seed crop grown within a Brassica seed production district or, for purposes of RCW 15.51.030, within a proposed Brassica seed production district.

(7) "Volunteer and weed Brassica plants" means plants of the genus Brassica that arise from accidental or unintentional scattering or occurrence of seed.

[ 2007 c 181 s 2.]